Connecticut, session 2026, HB05494.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Labor Commissioner shall
2 conduct a study relating to youth employment classification. Such study
3 shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) An analysis of current work-
4 based learning experience programs for minors that require payment of
5 the minimum fair wage, and (2) the benefits and considerations
6 necessary to reclassify such work-based learning experience programs
7 in order to allow such programs to be eligible to provide stipends to
8 minors participating in such programs in lieu of payment of the fair
9 minimum wage. For purposes of this subsection, "minimum fair wage"
10 has the same meaning as provided in section 31-58 of the general
11 statutes.
12 (b) Not later than January 1, 2027, the commissioner shall report the
13 results of such study to the joint standing committee of the General
HB5494 / File No. 394 1

HB5494 File No. 394
14 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to labor and public
15 employees, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
16 general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
LAB Joint Favorable
HB5494 / File No. 394 2

HB5494 File No. 394
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Labor Dept. GF - Cost Up to None
$100,000
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Department of Labor (DOL) to conduct a study
of youth employment classification. This results in a one-time cost in FY
27 of up to $100,000 to hire a consultant as the agency does not have the
staff capacity to conduct such a study.
The Out Years
None.
HB5494 / File No. 394 3

HB5494 File No. 394
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5494
AN ACT CONCERNING A STUDY OF YOUTH EMPLOYMENT
CLASSIFICATION.